Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0272.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 67. (1) A change in a condominium project shall must be reflected in an amendment to the appropriate condominium document. An amendment to the condominium document is subject to sections 90, 90a, and 91. (2) If a change involves a change in the boundaries of a condominium unit or the addition or elimination of condominium units, a replat of the condominium subdivision plan shall must be prepared and recorded assigning a condominium unit number to each condominium unit in the amended project. The replat of the condominium subdivision plan shall must be designated replat number __________ of __________ county condominium subdivision plan number __________, using the same plan number assigned to the original condominium subdivision plan. (3) Notwithstanding section 33, for 10 years after the recording of the master deed, the developer, its successors, or assigns may withdraw from the project any undeveloped land or convert the undeveloped condominium units located thereon on the undeveloped land to "must be built" without the prior consent of any co-owners, mortgagees of condominium units in the project, or any other party having an interest in the project. If the master deed confers on the developer expansion, contraction, or convertibility rights with respect to condominium units or common elements in the condominium project, then the time period is 10 years after the recording of the master deed or 6 years after the recording of the amendment to the master deed by which the developer last exercised its expansion, contraction, or convertibility rights, whichever period ends later. Any undeveloped land so that is withdrawn in accordance with this subsection is automatically granted easements for utility and access purposes through the condominium project for the benefit of the undeveloped land. (4) If the developer does not withdraw the undeveloped land from the project or convert the undeveloped condominium units to "must be built" before the expiration of the applicable time period described under subsection (3), the association of co-owners, by an affirmative 2/3 majority vote of the members in good standing, may declare that the undeveloped land shall must remain part of the project but shall must revert to general common elements and that all rights to construct condominium units upon on that undeveloped land shall must cease. When such a declaration described under this subsection is made, the association of co-owners shall provide written notice of the declaration to the developer or any successor developer by first-class mail at its the developer's or any successor developer's last known address. Within 60 days after receipt of the written notice of the declaration, the developer or any successor developer may withdraw the undeveloped land or convert the undeveloped condominium units to "must be built". However, if the undeveloped land is not withdrawn or the undeveloped condominium units are not converted within 60 days, the association of co-owners may file the notice of the declaration with the register of deeds. The notice of declaration filed with the registrar of deeds takes effect upon recording by the register of deeds. The association of co-owners shall also file notice of the declaration with the local supervisor or assessing officer. In such an event, if it If an association of co-owners files a notice of declaration with the local supervisor or assessing officer and it becomes necessary to adjust percentages of value as a result of fewer condominium units existing, a co-owner or the association of co-owners may bring an action to require revisions to the percentages of value under section 95. (5) A reversion under subsection (4), whether occurring before or after the date of the September 21, 2016, amendatory act that added this subsection, is not effective unless the election, notice, and recording requirements of subsection (4) have been met. (6) Subsections (3) and (4) do not apply to condominium units that are no longer owned by the developer or by the owner of the property at the time the property became part of the condominium project, unless the purchaser from the developer or owner of the property at the time the property became part of the condominium project is a successor developer under section 135. (7) As used in this section, "undeveloped land" means land on which were recorded 1 or more condominium units, none of which were either identified in the condominium subdivision plan as "must be built" or have had construction commenced, although infrastructure construction or common element construction may have commenced. Undeveloped land does not include condominium units that are depicted or described before or after September 21, 2016, on the condominium subdivision plan pursuant to under section 66 as containing no vertical improvements, regardless of the date of the creation of the condominium project or of that condominium subdivision plan.